Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Medical Assistance (State Medicaid Program)
205.540.
Advisory Council for Medical Assistance — Membership — Expenses — Meetings — Qualifications of members.

An Advisory Council for Medical Assistance shall be established in the state government. The council shall consist of twenty-two (22) members. The secretary for health and family services shall be an ex officio member. The other twenty-one (21) members of the council shall be appointed by the Governor and shall hold office for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and qualify, except that the members appointed to fill the first vacancy occurring for a term beginning on July 1, 1960, shall be as follows: Two (2) members shall be appointed for one (1) year, two (2) for two (2) years, two (2) for three (3) years, and three (3) for four (4) years, and the respective terms of the first members shall be designated by the Governor at the time of their appointments. Upon the expiration of the respective terms of the members first appointed, the term of each successor shall be for four (4) years and until his successor is appointed and qualified. Thirteen (13) of the appointments shall be made one (1) from each list of three (3) nominees submitted by the following organizations: the Kentucky State Medical Association; the Kentucky Dental Association; the Kentucky Hospital Association; the Kentucky Medical Equipment Suppliers Association; the Kentucky Pharmacists Association; the Kentucky Association of Health Care Facilities; the Kentucky Nurses’ Association; the State Board of Podiatry; the Kentucky Home Care Association; the Kentucky Optometric Association; the Kentucky Primary Care Association; the Kentucky Association of Hospice and Palliative Care; and the Kentucky Association of Homes and Services for the Aging, Inc. The other eight (8) appointive members shall be health care advocates knowledgeable about health care and the health care industry, and shall include three (3) medical assistance recipients; one (1) representative of a recognized consumer advocacy group representing the elderly; one (1) representative of a recognized consumer advocacy group representing persons reentering society following incarceration; and three (3) representatives of recognized consumer advocacy groups whose membership includes low-income persons, children and youth, women, minorities, and disabled persons.

Each appointive member of the council shall serve without compensation but each council member not otherwise compensated for his or her time or expenses shall be entitled to reimbursement for his or her actual and necessary expenses in carrying out his or her duties with reimbursement for expenses being made in accordance with state regulations relating to travel reimbursement.

Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments, maintaining representations as set out in subsection (1) of this section.

The council shall elect a chairman, vice chairman, and secretary from among its members at its first regular meeting in each fiscal year and shall adopt rules governing its proceedings. The council shall hold a meeting at least once every three (3) months and such other special or regular meetings as may be desired.

The eight (8) appointive members who are healthcare advocates shall not have a fiduciary relationship or interest in any health-care facility or service.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VII, § 5; 1968, ch. 191, § 1; 1970, ch. 78, § 2; 1972, ch. 203, § 42; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, §§ 48, 107(1), (15), (16); 1974, ch. 225, § 2; 1978, ch. 36, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 248, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 91, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 196, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 230, effective June 20, 2005; 2016 ch. 103, § 19, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 11, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

205.550.
Subjects on which council advises.

The council shall advise the Cabinet for Health and Family Services about health and medical care services.

The council shall have the opportunity for participation in policy development and program administration and shall advise the Cabinet for Health and Family Services on such matters.

The council shall give advice regarding how to further the participation of recipient members in the policy development and program administration of the Medical Assistance Program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VII, § 6; 1960 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, §§ 49, 107(12); 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 9, effective February 10, 1979; 1982, ch. 248, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 426, § 197, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 231, effective June 20, 2005.

205.5510.
Definitions for KRS 205.5510 to 205.5520.

As used in KRS 205.5510 to 205.5520, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Department for Medicaid Services;

“Managed care organization” has the same meaning as in KRS 205.532;

“Pharmacy benefit manager” has the same meaning as in KRS 304.9-020;

“Spread pricing” means any technique by which a pharmacy benefit manager or other administrator of pharmacy benefits charges or claims an amount from an insurer or managed care organization for pharmacy or pharmacist services, including payment for a prescription drug, that is different than the amount the pharmacy benefit manager or other administrator pays to the pharmacy or pharmacist that provided the services; and

“State pharmacy benefit manager” means the pharmacy benefit manager contracted by the department, pursuant to KRS 205.5512, to administer pharmacy benefits for all Medicaid recipients enrolled in a managed care organization in the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 70, § 1, effective March 27, 2020.

205.5512.
Selection of and contract with third-party administrator as pharmacy benefit manager for Medicaid managed care organizations — Requirements for department’s contracts, procurement process, disclosure of information, and legislative committee review.

By December 31, 2020, the department, in accordance with KRS Chapter 45A, shall select and contract with a third-party administrator to serve as the state pharmacy benefit manager for every managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services.

The state pharmacy benefit manager shall be responsible for administering all pharmacy benefits for Medicaid recipients enrolled in a managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services.

Each contract entered into or renewed by the department for the delivery of Medicaid services by a managed care organization after the cabinet has selected and contracted with the state pharmacy benefit manager shall require the managed care organization to contract with and utilize the state pharmacy benefit manager for the purpose of administering all pharmacy benefits for Medicaid recipients enrolled with the managed care organization.

As part of the procurement process to select the state pharmacy benefit manager, the department shall:

Establish eligibility criteria that an entity shall meet in order to be eligible to become the state pharmacy benefit manager;

Accept proposals from eligible entities seeking to become the state pharmacy benefit manager;

Establish a master contract to be used by the department when contracting with the state pharmacy benefit manager, which shall:

Establish the state pharmacy benefit manager’s fiduciary duty owed to the department;

Comply with the provisions of KRS 205.5514(4);

Require:

The use of pass-through pricing; and

The state pharmacy benefit manager to use the preferred drug list, reimbursement methodologies, and dispensing fees established by the department pursuant to KRS 205.5514(1); and

Prohibit:

The use of spread pricing; and

The state pharmacy benefit manager from:

Reducing payment for pharmacy or pharmacist services, directly or indirectly, under a reconciliation process to an effective rate of reimbursement. This prohibition shall include without limitation creating, imposing, or establishing direct or indirect remuneration fees, generic effective rates, dispensing effective rates, brand effective rates, any other effective rates, in-network fees, performance fees, pre-adjudication fees, post-adjudication fees, or any other mechanism that reduces, or aggregately reduces, payment for pharmacy or pharmacist services;

Creating, modifying, implementing, or indirectly establishing any fee on a pharmacy, pharmacist, or a Medicaid recipient without first seeking and obtaining written approval from the department to do so;

Requiring a Medicaid recipient to obtain a specialty drug from a specialty pharmacy owned by or otherwise associated with the state pharmacy benefit manager;

Requiring or incentivizing a Medicaid recipient to use a pharmacy owned by or otherwise associated with the state pharmacy benefit manager; and

Requiring a Medicaid recipient to use a mail-order pharmaceutical distributor or mail-order pharmacy; and

Select and contract with a single third-party administrator to serve as the state pharmacy benefit manager to administer all pharmacy benefits for Medicaid recipients enrolled in a managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services.

As part of the procurement process to select the state pharmacy benefit manager, an entity seeking to become the state pharmacy benefit manager shall disclose the following information:

Any activity, policy, practice, contract including any national pharmacy contract, or agreement of the entity that may directly or indirectly present a conflict of interest in the entity’s relationship with the department or a managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services;

Any direct or indirect fees, charges, or any kind of assessments imposed by the pharmacy benefit manager on pharmacies licensed in Kentucky:

With which the pharmacy benefit manager shares common ownership, management, or control;

Which are owned, managed, or controlled by any of the pharmacy benefit manager’s management companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or companies otherwise affiliated by a common owner, manager, or holding company;

Which share any common members on the board of directors; or

Which share managers in common;

Any direct or indirect fees, charges, or any kind of assessments imposed by the pharmacy benefit manager on pharmacies licensed in Kentucky which operate:

More than ten (10) locations in the Commonwealth; or

Ten (10) or fewer locations in the Commonwealth; and

All common ownership, management, common members of a board of directors, shared managers, or control of a pharmacy benefit manager, or any of the pharmacy benefit manager’s management companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or companies otherwise affiliated by a common owner, manager, or holding company with:

A managed care organization and its affiliated companies;

An entity that contracts on behalf of a pharmacy or any pharmacy services administration organization and its affiliated companies;

A drug wholesaler or distributor and its affiliated companies;

A third-party payor and its affiliated companies; and

A pharmacy and its affiliated companies.

The contract between the department and the state pharmacy benefit manager shall be submitted to the Government Contract Review Committee of the Legislative Research Commission for comment and review.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 70, § 2, effective March 27, 2020.

205.5514.
Department’s duties regarding state pharmacy benefit management.

The department shall:

Establish a single preferred drug list to be used by the state pharmacy benefit manager for each managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services; and

Promulgate administrative regulations that establish:

Reimbursement methodologies; and

Dispensing fees which may take into account applicable guidance by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and which may, to the extent permitted under federal law, vary by pharmacy type, including rural and independently owned pharmacies, chain pharmacies, and pharmacies owned or contracted by a health care facility that is registered as a covered entity pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 256b.

The reimbursement methodologies and dispensing fees established by the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be used by the state pharmacy benefit manager for each managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services.

The state pharmacy benefit manager shall administer, adjudicate, and reimburse pharmacy benefit claims submitted by pharmacies to the state pharmacy benefit manager in accordance with:

The terms of any contract between a health care facility that is registered as a covered entity pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 256b and a Medicaid managed care organization;

The terms and conditions of the contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and the Commonwealth; and

The reimbursement methodologies and dispensing fees established by the department, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

The following shall apply to the state pharmacy benefit manager, the contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and the department, and, where applicable, any contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy:

The department shall be responsible for reviewing and shall approve or deny:

Any contract, any change in the terms of a contract, or suspension or termination of a contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy licensed under KRS Chapter 315; and

Any contract, any change in the terms of a contract, or suspension or termination of a contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and an entity that contracts on behalf of a pharmacy licensed under KRS Chapter 315;

The state pharmacy benefit manager shall comply with KRS 304.9-053, 304.9-054, and 304.9-055;

After December 1, 2020, the state pharmacy benefit manager shall not enter into, renew, extend, or amend a national contract with any pharmacy that is inconsistent with:

The terms and conditions of the contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and the Commonwealth; or

The reimbursement methodologies and dispensing fees established by the department, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;

When creating or establishing a pharmacy network for a managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services, the state pharmacy benefit manager shall not discriminate against any pharmacy or pharmacist that is:
(d) 1.

When creating or establishing a pharmacy network for a managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services, the state pharmacy benefit manager shall not discriminate against any pharmacy or pharmacist that is:

Located within the geographic coverage area of the managed care organization; and

Willing to agree to or accept reasonable terms and conditions established by the state pharmacy benefit manager, or other administrator for network participation, including obtaining preferred participation status.

Discrimination prohibited by this paragraph shall include denying a pharmacy the opportunity to participate in a pharmacy network at preferred participation status; and

A contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy shall not release the state pharmacy benefit manager from the obligation to make any payments owed to the pharmacy for services rendered prior to the termination of the contract between the state pharmacy benefit manager and the pharmacy or removal of the pharmacy from the pharmacy network.

Reimbursement methodologies established by administrative regulations shall not discriminate against pharmacies owned or contracted by a health care facility that is registered as a covered entity pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 256b, to the extent allowable by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 70, § 3, effective March 27, 2020.

205.5516.
Compliance of payment arrangements with state and federal laws and regulations.

All payment arrangements between the department, managed care organizations, and the state pharmacy benefit manager shall comply with state and federal statutes, regulations adopted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and any other agreement between the department and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The department may change a payment arrangement in order to comply with state and federal statutes, regulations adopted by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid services, or any other agreement between the department and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid services.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 70, § 4, effective March 27, 2020.

205.5518.
Required and prohibited actions by pharmacy benefit manager — Penalty for violation.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, beginning on March 27, 2020, and continuing until December 31, 2020, a pharmacy benefit manager contracted with a managed care organization to administer Medicaid benefits shall not:

Adjust, modify, change, or amend reimbursement methodologies, dispensing fees, and any other fees paid by the pharmacy benefit manager to pharmacies licensed in the Commonwealth;

Create, modify, implement, or indirectly establish any fee on a pharmacy, pharmacist, or a Medicaid recipient in the Commonwealth; and

Make any adjustments, modifications, or changes to a pharmacy network for the managed care organization with whom the pharmacy benefit manager has contracted to administer Medicaid benefits.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, beginning on March 27, 2020, and continuing until December 31, 2020, a pharmacy benefit manager contracted with a managed care organization to administer Medicaid benefits shall:

Administer, adjudicate, and, when appropriate, reimburse any pharmacy benefit claim submitted to the managed care organization prior to the termination of the contract between the pharmacy benefit manager and the managed care organization in accordance with the contract between the pharmacy benefit manager and the managed care organization; and

Not be released from its obligation to make any payments owed to a pharmacy licensed in the Commonwealth for pharmacy services rendered prior to the termination of the contract between the pharmacy benefit manager and the managed care organization.

The department shall impose a fine of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day per separate violation on a pharmacy benefit manager who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 70, § 5, effective March 27, 2020.

205.5520.
Annual recommendations regarding pharmacy benefit reimbursement methodologies and dispensing fees.

By December 1, 2020, and at least annually thereafter, the Technical Advisory Committee on Pharmacy established in KRS 205.590 shall make recommendations to the department regarding the reimbursement methodologies and dispensing fees used by the state pharmacy benefit manager pursuant to KRS 205.5514.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 70, § 6, effective March 27, 2020.

205.558.
Prescreening and admissions review system.

To prevent inappropriate placement and to contain costs related thereto, the secretary for health and family services shall implement a statewide prescreening and admissions review system, including the imposition of a resource means test, for all long-term-care facilities and beds, as defined under KRS Chapter 216, and any acute-care hospital-based skilled-nursing or intermediate-care beds participating under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, regardless of the payment status of the resident upon admission. Any person having resources sufficient to cover the cost of care for at least three hundred sixty-five (365) days following admission may be admitted to a long-term care bed or facility if such person so desires; provided, however, that if a person:

Is admitted to a long-term-care facility or acute-care hospital-based skilled-nursing or intermediate-care bed without participating in the prescreening and admissions review system; or

Participates in the prescreening and admissions review system and is not authorized for placement in a long-term-care facility or acute-care hospital-based skilled-nursing or intermediate-care bed;

To implement the provisions of this section the cabinet shall establish preadmission screening teams composed of a nurse, social worker, and physician.

Before preauthorization of any person for admission to an intermediate-care facility or skilled-care facility or acute-care hospital-based skilled-nursing or intermediate-care bed, the cabinet shall first make the following determinations:

The health status and care needs of the person require immediate institutionalization in an intermediate-care facility or skilled-nursing facility or acute-care hospital-based skilled-nursing or intermediate-care bed;

The person and his family have been fully advised of alternatives to institutional care and possible sources of reimbursement for such care;

Alternatives to institutional care are not feasible; and

Other such determinations as specified by administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet under KRS Chapter 13A.

Admission of a person to an intermediate-care facility, or a skilled-nursing facility without first obtaining prior authorization from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall constitute a Class B violation.

The secretary for the cabinet shall promulgate such administrative regulations, subject to KRS Chapter 13A, as necessary to implement this section.

such person is not eligible for medical assistance payment for skilled-nursing or intermediate-care for one (1) year after the date of the person’s admission to a skilled-nursing or intermediate-care facility or acute-care hospital-based skilled-nursing or intermediate-care bed unless the person subsequently participates in the prescreening and admissions review system and is authorized for admission to an intermediate-care or skilled-nursing facility or acute-care hospital-based skilled-nursing or intermediate-care bed.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 466, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 426, § 198, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 232, effective June 20, 2005.

205.559.
Requirements for Medicaid reimbursement to participating providers for telehealth consultations — Reimbursement for rural health clinics, federally qualified health centers, and federally qualified health center look-alikes — Audio-only encounters.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services and any managed care organization with whom the Department for Medicaid Services contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services shall provide Medicaid reimbursement for covered telehealth services and telehealth consultations, if the telehealth service or telehealth consultation:

Is provided by a Medicaid-participating practitioner, including those employed by a home health agency licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216, to a Medicaid recipient or another Medicaid-participating practitioner at a different physical location; and

Meets all clinical, technology, and medical coding guidelines for recipient safety and appropriate delivery of services established by the Department for Medicaid Services or the provider’s professional licensure board.

For rural health clinics, federally qualified health centers, and federally qualified health center look-alikes, reimbursement for covered telehealth services and telehealth consultations shall:
(2) (a)

For rural health clinics, federally qualified health centers, and federally qualified health center look-alikes, reimbursement for covered telehealth services and telehealth consultations shall:

To the extent permitted under federal law, include an originating site fee in an amount equal to that which is permitted under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395m for Medicare-participating providers if the Medicaid beneficiary who received the telehealth service or telehealth consultation was physically located at the rural health clinic, federally qualified health center, or federally qualified health center look-alike at the time of service or consultation delivery and the provider of the telehealth service or telehealth consultation is not employed by the rural health clinic, federally qualified health center, or federally qualified health center look-alike; or

If the telehealth service or telehealth consultation provider is employed by the rural health clinic, federally qualified health center, or federally qualified health center look-alike, include a supplemental reimbursement paid by the Department for Medicaid Services in an amount equal to the difference between the actual reimbursement amount paid by a Medicaid managed care organization and the amount that would have been paid if reimbursement had been made directly by the department.

A request for reimbursement shall not be denied solely because:

An in-person consultation between a Medicaid-participating practitioner and a patient did not occur; or

A Medicaid-participating provider employed by a rural health clinic, federally qualified health center, or federally qualified health center look-alike was not physically located on the premises of the clinic or health center when the telehealth service or telehealth consultation was provided.

Telehealth services and telehealth consultations shall not be reimbursable under this section if they are provided through the use of a facsimile machine, text, chat, or electronic mail unless the Department for Medicaid Services determines that telehealth can be provided via these modalities in ways that enhance recipient health and well-being and meet all clinical and technology guidelines for recipient safety and appropriate delivery of services.

A health-care facility that receives reimbursement under this section for consultations provided by a Medicaid-participating provider who practices in that facility and a health professional who obtains a consultation under this section shall establish quality-of-care protocols, which may include a requirement for an annual in-person or face-to-face consultation with a patient who receives telehealth services, and patient confidentiality guidelines to ensure that telehealth consultations meet all requirements and patient care standards as required by law.
(3) (a)

A health-care facility that receives reimbursement under this section for consultations provided by a Medicaid-participating provider who practices in that facility and a health professional who obtains a consultation under this section shall establish quality-of-care protocols, which may include a requirement for an annual in-person or face-to-face consultation with a patient who receives telehealth services, and patient confidentiality guidelines to ensure that telehealth consultations meet all requirements and patient care standards as required by law.

The Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services shall not deny reimbursement for telehealth services covered by this section based solely on quality-of-care protocols adopted by a health-care facility pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The cabinet shall not require a telehealth consultation if an in-person consultation with a Medicaid-participating provider is reasonably available where the patient resides, works, or attends school or if the patient prefers an in-person consultation.

The cabinet shall request any waivers of federal laws or regulations that may be necessary to implement this section and KRS 205.5591.

Medicaid-participating practitioners and home health agencies are strongly encouraged to use audio-only encounters as a mode of delivering telehealth services only when no other approved mode of delivering telehealth services is available.

As used in this section:

“Federally qualified health center” means the same as in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396d;

“Federally qualified health center look-alike” means an organization that meets all of the eligibility requirements of a federally qualified health center but does not receive federal grants issued pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 254b;

“Originating site” means the site at which a Medicaid beneficiary is physically located at the time a telehealth service or telehealth consultation is provided; and

“Rural health clinic” means the same as in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 376, § 4, effective July 15, 2001; 2005, ch. 99, § 233, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 26, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 187, § 3, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 67, § 7, effective June 29, 2021.

205.5591.
Medicaid providers using telehealth — Duties of cabinet, Department for Medicaid Services, and managed care organizations — Administrative regulations — Policies and guidelines.

The cabinet shall provide oversight, guidance, and direction to Medicaid providers delivering care using telehealth.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall:

Within thirty (30) days after June 29, 2021:

Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish requirements for telehealth coverage and reimbursement rates, which shall be equivalent to coverage requirements and reimbursement rates for the same service provided in person unless the telehealth provider and the department or a managed care organization contractually agree to a lower reimbursement rate for telehealth services; and

Create, establish, or designate the claim forms, records required, and authorization procedures to be followed in conjunction with this section andKRS 205.559;

Require that specialty care be rendered by a health care provider who is recognized and actively participating in the Medicaid program;

Require that any required prior authorization requesting a referral or consultation for specialty care be processed by the patient’s primary care provider and that any specialist coordinate care with the patient’s primary care provider; and

Require a telehealth provider to be licensed in Kentucky, or as allowed under the standards and provisions of a recognized interstate compact, in order to receive reimbursement for telehealth services.

In accordance with KRS 211.336, the Department for Medicaid Services and any managed care organization with whom the department contracts for the delivery of Medicaid services shall not:

Require a Medicaid provider to be physically present with a Medicaid recipient, unless the provider determines that it is medically necessary to perform those services in person;

Require prior authorization, medical review, or administrative clearance for telehealth that would not be required if a service were provided in person;

Require a Medicaid provider to be employed by another provider or agency in order to provide telehealth services that would not be required if that service were provided in person;

Require demonstration that it is necessary to provide services to a Medicaid recipient through telehealth;

Restrict or deny coverage of telehealth based solely on the communication technology or application used to deliver the telehealth services; or

Require a Medicaid provider to be part of a telehealth network.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the Medicaid program or a Medicaid managed care organization to:

Provide coverage for telehealth services that are not medically necessary; or

Reimburse any fees charged by a telehealth facility for transmission of a telehealth encounter.

The cabinet, in implementing KRS 211.334 and 211.336, shall maintain telehealth policies and guidelines to providing care that ensure that Medicaid-eligible citizens will have safe, adequate, and efficient medical care, and that prevent waste, fraud, and abuse of the Medicaid program.

In order to comply with the deadline for the promulgation of administrative regulations established in subsection (2) of this section, the Department for Medicaid Services may promulgate emergency administrative regulations in accordance with KRS 13A.190.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 187, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 62, § 3, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 67, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.